morphophonology/foma/pcsuff5.lexc
Multichar_Symbols @P.S_OBJ_MARKS.ON@ @R.IL.ON@ @D.IL.ON@

LEXICON Root
! need full treatment of ICS allomorphy 
@P.S_OBJ_MARKS.ON@-t #;
-ət                  #;
-š                   #;
@D.IL.ON@-c          #; ! allative applicative allomorph, 
                        ! should only attach to non -il/-agʷil  words
@R.IL.ON@-s          #; ! allative applicative allomorph, 
                        ! should only attach to -il/-agʷil words
-b                   #; ! CSMD
